Missouri, session 2026, HB1928.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.012, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 191.947 and 571.012, to read as follows:
191.947. 1. As used in this section, the term "health care professional" shall
have the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a health care
professional shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability for any of the following
during a medical examination or assessment of a patient:
(1) Inquiring into the presence or absence of a harmful or potentially harmful
device or substance in the patient's private home or residence;
(2) Inquiring into whether the patient is subject to any other harmful or
potentially harmful situation in his or her private home or residence;
(3) Counseling or educating the patient or the patient's guardian about best
practices in storage and maintenance of any hazardous device or substance in the
patient's private home or residence; or
(4) Documenting or maintaining in the patient's medical records any
information obtained from an inquiry described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this
subsection and any counseling or education provided to the patient or the patient's
guardian as described under subdivision (3) of this subsection.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1928 2
571.012. 1. No health care professional licensed in this state, nor anyone under his or
her supervision, shall be required by law to:
(1) Inquire as to whether a patient owns or has access to a firearm;
(2) Document or maintain in a patient's medical records whether such patient owns or
has access to a firearm; or
(3) Notify any governmental entity of the identity of a patient based solely on the
patient's status as an owner of, or the patient's access to, a firearm.
2. No health care professional licensed in this state, nor anyone under his or her
supervision, nor any person or entity that has possession or control of medical records, may
disclose information gathered in a doctor/patient relationship about the status of a patient as
an owner of a firearm, unless by order of a court of appropriate jurisdiction, in response to a
threat to the health or safety of that patient or another person, as part of a referral to a mental
health professional, or with the patient's express consent on a separate document dealing
solely with firearm ownership. The separate document shall not be filled out as a matter of
routine, but only when, in the judgment of the health care professional, it is medically
indicated or necessitated.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting or otherwise restricting a
health care professional from inquiring about and documenting whether a patient owns or has
access to a firearm [if such inquiry or documentation is necessitated or medically indicated by
the health care professional's judgment and such inquiry or documentation does not violate
any other state or federal law] or engaging in any other activity described in section
191.947.
4. No health care professional licensed in this state shall use an electronic medical
record program that requires, in order to complete and save a medical record, entry of data
regarding whether a patient owns, has access to, or lives in a home containing a firearm.
✔